Utah statutes.
19-3-304.   Licensing and approval by governor and Legislature -- Powers and
duties of the department.
(1) (a)  A person may not construct or operate a waste transfer, storage,
decay in storage, treatment, or disposal facility within the exterior
boundaries of the state without applying for and receiving a construction and
operating license from the state Department of Environmental Quality and also
obtaining approval from the Legislature and the governor.
(b)  The Department of Environmental Quality may issue the license, and the
Legislature and the governor may approve the license, only upon finding the
requirements and standards of this part have been met.
(2)  The department shall by rule establish the procedures and forms required
to submit an application for a construction and operating license under this
part.
(3)  The department may make rules implementing this part as necessary for the
protection of the public health and the environment, including:
(a)  rules for safe and proper construction, installation, repair, use, and
operation of waste transfer, storage, decay in storage, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(b)  rules governing prevention of and responsibility for costs incurred
regarding accidents that may occur in conjunction with the operation of the
facilities; and
(c)  rules providing for disciplinary action against the license upon
violation of any of the licensure requirements under this part or rules made
under this part.
